Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-202
Articles of incorporation; filing.

The articles of incorporation shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State, and a certified copy shall be filed and recorded in the office of the county clerk of the county in which the corporation has its principal office. Articles of incorporation and other records relating to the corporate existence of the trust company shall be maintained as a permanent record of the trust company.

Laws 1911, c. 31, § 2, p. 188;

R.S.1913, p. 739;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. XVIII, § 2, p. 718;

C.S.1922, § 8064;

C.S.1929, § 8-202;

R.S.1943, § 8-202;

Laws 1993, LB 81, § 15.